dev/verb_pardefs.dix
<pardef n="/braconnéieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>braconnéieren</l><r>braconnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>braconnéiert</l><r>braconnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>braconnéieren</l><r>braconnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>braconnéiers</l><r>braconnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>braconnéiert</l><r>braconnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>braconnéieren</l><r>braconnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>braconnéiert</l><r>braconnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>braconnéieren</l><r>braconnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>braconnéier</l><r>braconnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>braconnéiert</l><r>braconnéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/brauchen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>brauchen</l><r>brauchen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/brauen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>brauen</l><r>brauen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gebraut</l><r>brauen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>brauen</l><r>brauen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>braus</l><r>brauen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>braut</l><r>brauen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brauen</l><r>brauen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>braut</l><r>brauen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brauen</l><r>brauen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>brau</l><r>brauen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>braut</l><r>brauen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/bremsen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>bremsen</l><r>bremsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gebremst</l><r>bremsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>bremsen</l><r>bremsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brems</l><r>bremsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bremst</l><r>bremsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bremsen</l><r>bremsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bremst</l><r>bremsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bremsen</l><r>bremsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>brems</l><r>bremsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bremst</l><r>bremsen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/brennen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>brennen</l><r>brennen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gebrannt</l><r>brennen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>brennen</l><r>brennen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brenns</l><r>brennen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brennt</l><r>brennen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brennen</l><r>brennen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brennt</l><r>brennen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brennen</l><r>brennen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>brenn</l><r>brennen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brennt</l><r>brennen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/bretzen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>bretzen</l><r>bretzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gebretzt</l><r>bretzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>bretzen</l><r>bretzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bretz</l><r>bretzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bretzt</l><r>bretzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bretzen</l><r>bretzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bretzt</l><r>bretzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bretzen</l><r>bretzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>bretz</l><r>bretzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bretzt</l><r>bretzen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/bricoléieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>bricoléieren</l><r>bricoléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bricoléiert</l><r>bricoléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>bricoléieren</l><r>bricoléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bricoléiers</l><r>bricoléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bricoléiert</l><r>bricoléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bricoléieren</l><r>bricoléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bricoléiert</l><r>bricoléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bricoléieren</l><r>bricoléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>bricoléier</l><r>bricoléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bricoléiert</l><r>bricoléieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/briechen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>briechen</l><r>briechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gebrach</l><r>briechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>briechen</l><r>briechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bréchs</l><r>briechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brécht</l><r>briechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>briechen</l><r>briechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>briecht</l><r>briechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>briechen</l><r>briechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>briech</l><r>briechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>briecht</l><r>briechen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/broden__vblex">
  <e><p><l>broden</l><r>broden<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/brodéieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>brodéieren</l><r>brodéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brodéiert</l><r>brodéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>brodéieren</l><r>brodéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brodéiers</l><r>brodéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brodéiert</l><r>brodéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brodéieren</l><r>brodéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brodéiert</l><r>brodéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brodéieren</l><r>brodéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>brodéier</l><r>brodéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brodéiert</l><r>brodéieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/brutaliséieren__vblex">
  <e><p><l>brutaliséieren</l><r>brutaliséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutaliséiert</l><r>brutaliséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>brutaliséieren</l><r>brutaliséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutaliséiers</l><r>brutaliséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutaliséiert</l><r>brutaliséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutaliséieren</l><r>brutaliséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutaliséiert</l><r>brutaliséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutaliséieren</l><r>brutaliséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>brutaliséier</l><r>brutaliséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutaliséiert</l><r>brutaliséieren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/brutschelen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>brutschelen</l><r>brutschelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gebrutschelt</l><r>brutschelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>brutschelen</l><r>brutschelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutschels</l><r>brutschelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutschelt</l><r>brutschelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutschelen</l><r>brutschelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutschelt</l><r>brutschelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutschelen</l><r>brutschelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>brutschel</l><r>brutschelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutschelt</l><r>brutschelen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/brutschen__vblex">
  <e><p><l>brutschen</l><r>brutschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gebrutscht</l><r>brutschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>brutschen</l><r>brutschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutschs</l><r>brutschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutscht</l><r>brutschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutschen</l><r>brutschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutscht</l><r>brutschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutschen</l><r>brutschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>brutsch</l><r>brutschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>brutscht</l><r>brutschen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/bréien__vblex">
  <e><p><l>bréien</l><r>bréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>gebréit</l><r>bréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>bréien</l><r>bréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bréis</l><r>bréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bréit</l><r>bréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bréien</l><r>bréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bréit</l><r>bréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bréien</l><r>bréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e><p><l>bréi</l><r>bréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>bréit</l><r>bréien<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
